Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 6

Extension of Foster Care

37-2-601. Establishment of extension of foster care services advisory council.

The executive director of the Tennessee commission on children and youth shall establish a non-funded, voluntary, extension of foster care services advisory council, which shall be responsible for:

Identifying strategies to assess and track effectiveness of extension of foster care services and the operation of resources centers authorized by this part; and

Identifying the following:

Strategies for maintaining accurate numbers of children served by extension of foster care services;

The number of services provided by the department of children's services;

The number of children who accept these services;

Reasons why children do not accept these services; and

The number of children who continue their education and the number who do not.

The advisory council shall report no later than October 31 of each year to the Tennessee commission on children and youth, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the health and welfare committee of the senate, making recommendations for the continuing operation of the system of extension of foster care services and supports.

The department of children's services and other state agencies that provide services or supports to youth transitioning out of state custody shall participate fully in the council and shall respond to the recommendations put forth by the council as appropriate.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(j); 2013, ch. 236, § 78; 2014, ch. 508, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 39.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “extension of foster care services” for “post-custody services” throughout (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the health and welfare committee of the senate” for “the civil justice committee and health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate” in (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 508, § 3. March 6, 2014.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

37-2-602. Determination of whether youth applicants for assistance were formerly in state custody — Identification by state agencies on agency forms — Sharing of information.

All state agencies that administer cash or in-kind assistance, or both, to youth eighteen (18) to twenty-four (24) years of age within the course of normal business shall make reasonable efforts to determine if an applicant for assistance has ever been in the custody of the state. If the applicant has been in state custody, the state agency shall share information with the applicant regarding possible services to be provided by the department of children's services, other state agencies and community partners.

State agencies shall modify agency forms to identify youth who have been in state custody as the agencies' forms are otherwise revised and updated.

The department of children services may share services information for former foster youth and youth transitioning from state custody through already established models such as, but not limited to, web sites, emails, verbal notifications or other printed material.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

37-2-603. Establishment of resource centers to provide or facilitate assistance.

The private, nonprofit community is urged to establish a network to provide information, assistance, services and supports to persons from sixteen (16) to twenty-four (24) years of age who were in foster care on the person's eighteenth birthday and persons from sixteen (16) to twenty-four (24) years of age who have been in foster care at any time after the person's fourteenth birthday.

The resource centers shall provide or facilitate the assistance necessary to:

Deal with the challenges and barriers associated with the transition into adulthood and early adult years;

Support post-secondary education, vocational training and job skills development for such person;

Find and retain employment, housing, transportation, parenting and family support, health care and mental health care; and

Navigate systems and procedures that impact the person's education, employment, health and mental welfare and basic needs.

These services shall be available at any time until the person reaches twenty-four (24) years of age regardless of whether the youth elects to remain in a voluntary extension of foster care arrangement with the department or the youth chooses to terminate any relationship with the state.

The resource centers shall be supported in part by the department in the community where the centers are located, subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated for this purpose. The department is authorized and encouraged to share staff with the resource centers, as well as provide financial support.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1; 2014, ch. 508, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “voluntary extension of foster care arrangement” for “voluntary post-custody arrangement” in the middle of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 508, § 3. March 6, 2014.

37-2-604. Preparing foster children for independent living.

In preparing a foster child for independent living prior to the child reaching eighteen (18) years of age, the department shall provide information on the resource centers established pursuant to this part to all children over sixteen (16) years of age in foster care. The information shall include the address of the nearest resource center and services available from the center. Each child shall be encouraged to maintain periodic contact with resource center personnel and to provide current and accurate residence and contact information to the resource center. Ninety (90) days before a child leaves state custody the department of children's services shall notify the child of all information, services, web sites and assistance available for post-custody.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

37-2-605. Construction of part.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to require a person to have maintained continuous contact with the resource centers or the department in order to be eligible to receive services from the resource centers or the department.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.